Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 8.5
UNCLAIMED UTILITY DEPOSITS

Section

40-8.5-101. Legislative declaration.

In enacting this article 8.5, the general assembly finds and declares that there is a need to make distributions of money to provide aid and assistance to the indigent, the elderly, and persons with disabilities, who do not otherwise have the financial resources to meet their heating and other energy needs. The general assembly further finds and declares that the low-income energy assistance program of the department of human services is the most appropriate entity to determine those most in need of such aid and assistance. Therefore, this article 8.5 authorizes the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance to establish a fund from which to collect and distribute money to accomplish the goals set forth in this section. The money for the fund must be funded in part by unclaimed utility deposits.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1758, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1671, § 90, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2719, § 304, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3508, § 18, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

40-8.5-102. Applicability.

This article shall apply to any electric or gas utility, as defined by section 40-8.5-103; except that this article shall apply only to those cooperative electric associations, as defined by section 40-9.5-102, which notify the commission that they elect to come under this article.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1758, § 1, effective May 31.

40-8.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 8.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance established in section 40-8.5-103.5.

"Deposit" means moneys deposited by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment for services or any other amount which is paid in advance for electric or gas utility services to be furnished.

"Electric utility" means every electrical corporation operating for the purpose of supplying electricity to the public for domestic, mechanical, or public uses and includes every public utility supplying electricity; except that this definition includes only those cooperative electric associations which notify the commission that they elect to come under this article.

"Gas utility" means every gas corporation operating for the purpose of supplying gas to the public for domestic, mechanical, or public uses and includes every public utility supplying gas.

(4.5) "Organization" has the meaning set forth in section 40-8.7-103 (4).

"Unclaimed moneys" means:

Deposits, including any interest thereon, less any lawful deductions or amounts owed to a utility, that the utility has been directed to return to the subscriber by an administrative or judicial order or that is due the subscriber through the utility's security or construction deposit policy and that remains unclaimed by the subscriber for more than two years;

Moneys which shall be deemed unclaimed and presumed abandoned when left with the utility for more than two years after termination of the services for which the deposit or advance was made or for more than two years after the deposit becomes payable and the utility has made reasonable efforts to locate the owner of the unclaimed moneys or distribution is attempted pursuant to a final order of an administrative agency or judicial body having jurisdiction to establish the terms and conditions of such deposit or advance.

This term shall not include credits to existing subscribers through cost-adjustment mechanisms, and this term shall not include unclaimed patronage capital held by cooperative electric associations.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1758, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2021:

IP and (1) amended and (4.5) added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3496, § 4, effective September 7.

40-8.5-103.5. Commission created - duties.

Repealed.

Commencing May 1, 2022, there is created the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance in the Colorado energy office. The Colorado energy office shall staff the commission as needed.

Repealed.

Beginning May 1, 2022, the commission is composed of seven members including:
(3) (a) (I) Beginning May 1, 2022, the commission is composed of seven members including:

A representative of the department of human services created in section 26-1-105;

A representative of the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101;

A representative of the organization; and

Four members appointed by the governor, each to serve a term of four years; except that the governor shall select two of the initially appointed members to serve a two-year term.

The governor shall make initial appointments to the commission pursuant to this subsection (3)(a) on or before April 30, 2022, for terms starting on May 1, 2022.

Of the four members appointed by the governor:

One member must have received low-income energy assistance or represent an entity that serves a population eligible for low-income energy assistance;

One member must represent an electric utility or a combined electric and natural gas utility;

One member must represent a natural gas utility or a combined electric and natural gas utility; and

One member must represent a water utility.

Any interim appointment necessary to fill a vacancy that has occurred by any reason other than expiration of term is for the remainder of the term of the individual member whose office has become vacant.

In the event of a tie vote of the commission, the matter being voted upon fails.

The governor may remove any appointed commission member for cause, including for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty.

A commission member is immune from liability in any civil action brought against the member for acts occurring while acting in the capacity of a commission member if the member was acting in good faith, made reasonable efforts to obtain the facts of the matter as to which action was taken, and acted in the reasonable belief that the action taken was warranted by the facts.

The commission shall:

With respect to any federal department of energy grant award for the Colorado energy office weatherization assistance program, serve as the policy advisory council to the Colorado energy office, in accordance with 10 CFR 440.17;

Serve as an advisory council to any Colorado water utilities that provide or seek to provide water assistance and efficiency programs to their customers; and

Pursuant to section 40-8.7-108 (3), review the annual budget allocations that the organization develops and submits to the commission for review regarding the organization's use of the energy assistance system benefit charge collected pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5). If the commission does not approve the organization's annual budget allocation, the commission may require the organization to modify the allocation. Until the commission approves a budget allocation submitted by the organization, the most recently approved budget allocation remains in effect.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1759, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 2071, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2719, § 305, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 1333, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 981, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 298, § 52, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3496, § 5, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(a)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(a) and subsection (2)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective May 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, pp. 3496, 3497.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

40-8.5-104. Commencement of program - establishment of system for distribution of moneys to eligible recipients.

The commission shall establish a fund through a nonprofit corporation established for the purpose of collecting and distributing moneys to eligible recipients, who shall be designated by the administrator of the low-income energy assistance program in the department of human services, for use in the payment of electric and gas utility bills for services received.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1760, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2071, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2720, § 306, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

40-8.5-105. Eligibility.

The department of human services shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing the criteria for eligibility for recipients of assistance pursuant to this article, which criteria shall be based in part on household size and income and the energy costs of the household residence for the preceding year.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1760, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2720, § 307, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

40-8.5-106. Unclaimed deposits.

Unclaimed deposits shall be paid by the electric and gas utilities into the fund designated by the commission pursuant to section 40-8.5-104.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1760, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2072, § 33, effective July 1.

40-8.5-107. Disbursement of moneys.

The nonprofit corporation designated by the commission pursuant to section 40-8.5-104 shall disburse moneys to the state department of human services to make energy assistance payments on behalf of or to persons determined by the department to be eligible for such assistance in accordance with section 40-8.5-105.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1760, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1901, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2720, § 308, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.